Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF1538.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [145.9231] MINNESOTA EPILEPSY PROGRAM. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Purpose. new text end new text begin The purpose of the Minnesota Epilepsy Program is to: new text end new text begin (1) provide statewide support and education for people living with epilepsy and related seizure disorders to improve health outcomes and prevent early mortality including sudden unexpected death in epilepsy; new text end new text begin (2) develop training programs for health care workers, educators, and service providers; and new text end new text begin (3) collect data on epilepsy and related seizure disorders in Minnesota. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Epilepsy support and education. new text end new text begin (a) The commissioner of health shall identify priority actions and activities to address the needs for communication, services, resources, tools, strategies, and policies to support people living with epilepsy and their caregivers, including increasing access to one-on-one support services. Strategies shall include culturally specific and community-based approaches. The commissioner of health shall conduct an evaluation to determine the effectiveness of the strategies. new text end new text begin (b) The commissioner of health may administer funds appropriated for the purposes of this section to provide money to community organizations and coalitions to collaborate with one another or with the commissioner on strategies to improve health outcomes for people living with epilepsy and related disorders. The commissioner shall disburse grants and contracts the commissioner makes available through a request for proposal process or sole-source distribution where appropriate. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Professional training and education about epilepsy and related seizure disorders. new text end new text begin (a) The commissioner of health, in collaboration with the Board of Medical Practice, the Board of Nursing, other professional boards and state agencies, and nonprofit advocacy organizations with expertise in epilepsy and related seizure disorders, shall develop strategies, including but not limited to educational materials and trainings to increase knowledge and develop practical skills of health care providers, including emergency room providers, community health workers, and emergency medical service providers. The trainings must include methods for screening for epilepsy and related seizure disorders and making appropriate referrals to address the needs of individuals affected by epilepsy and related seizure disorders and their families. new text end new text begin (b) The commissioner of health may administer grants and contracts for the purposes of this section to provide money to organizations with expertise in epilepsy and related seizure disorders, including the development of materials and curriculum, and delivering training for schools required under section 121A.24, subdivision 2. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Data collection and state plan. new text end new text begin The commissioner of health shall establish a system for the collection, analysis, and reporting of data on seizure disorders in Minnesota, including number of diagnoses, clinical outcomes, mortality rates, and related population health data. The commissioner shall use the data collected to align statewide efforts and build coordinated systems and partnerships to support community-led and culturally responsive strategies to ensure Minnesotans at risk for or living with epilepsy and their caregivers have equitable access to opportunities and resources to support their well-being and quality of life. The commissioner of health shall conduct an evaluation to determine the effectiveness of the strategies. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin APPROPRIATION; MINNESOTA EPILEPSY PROGRAM.new text end new text begin $....... in fiscal year 2026 and $....... in fiscal year 2027 are appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of health for the Minnesota Epilepsy Program under Minnesota Statutes, section 145.9231. new text end